North Dakota, session 69, SB2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 39-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Blackout number plates.
1. The director shall issue blackout number plates under this section upon receiving payment of:
a. All other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor vehicle; and
b. An additional fee of twenty - five dollars per registration period .
2. Blackout number plates issued under this section must have:
a. A solid black background; and
b. White numbers and letters.
3. The director may issue blackout number plates under this section only to the owner of a
passenger motor vehicle, a truck the registered gross weight of which does not exceed twenty
thousand pounds [9071.85 kilograms], or a motorcycle.

S. B. NO. 2133 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2133.
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 8 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 8 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State